Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1120
Emergency custody order; expedited hearing.

If an emergency custody order is issued by the court under section 71-1119, the subject has a right to an expedited hearing to challenge the order. At such hearing, the petitioner has the burden of showing that there is probable cause to continue the emergency custody order. Such hearing shall be held within ten days after the date the subject is taken into emergency custody unless such requirement is waived by the subject or the subject is granted a continuance based upon his or her request. The Nebraska Evidence Rules do not apply at a hearing under this section. Upon conclusion of such hearing, the court may continue, modify, or vacate the emergency custody order.

Laws 2005, LB 206, § 20.

Nebraska Evidence Rules, see section 27-1103.